Maine, session 132, LD2098.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA c. 321, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §10017, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. BB, §1, is
amended to read:
The Higher Education Administrative Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," is
established within the department as a nonlapsing fund to receive participation fees and
application fees from institutions of higher education for applications under section 10707
and for applications for membership or membership renewal in the interstate reciprocity
agreement authorized under section 405, subsection 3, paragraph W. Funds deposited in
the fund must be used to support the department's facilitation of the interstate reciprocity
agreement and for other department costs associated with the administration of higher
education in the State.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §10703, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Basis for degree-granting authority. Temporary approval granted pursuant to this
section may not be used as a basis for a recommendation by the state board for permanent
degree-granting authority under section 10707.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §10707, as amended by PL 2007, c. 572, Pt. A, §13, is further
amended to read:
§10707. Applications
1. Degree-granting authority. Applications for authority to grant degrees shall must
be made on application to the state board on forms through a process provided by the
commissioner. An educational institution shall pay a fee for the initial application that
reflects the costs to the department for processing the application, as determined by the
commissioner.
A. The state board may recommend an educational institution to the Legislature for
degree-granting authority without additional review if:
Page 1 - 132LR2617(03)

(1) The state board has approved or renewed approval for the educational
institution to offer academic programs in the State within 5 years of the institution’s
application for degree-granting authority; and
(2) The educational institution has applied for degree-granting authority only for
degrees for which the institution offers academic programs approved by the state
board.
B. Upon recommending an educational institution to the Legislature for degree-
granting authority under section 10704, the state board shall provide any reports
resulting from completed state board reviews of the applicant educational institution to
the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education
matters.
2. Temporary use of name. Applications for temporary state board authority to use
the name "community college," "college" or "university" must be made to the state board
on forms through a process provided by the commissioner. An educational institution shall
pay a fee for the initial application that reflects the costs to the department for processing
the application, as determined by the commissioner.
3. Courses for academic credit. Applications by out-of-state educational institutions
to offer courses for academic credit shall must be made to the state board on forms through
a process provided by the commissioner. Such an educational institution shall pay a fee for
the initial application that reflects the costs to the department for processing the application,
as determined by the commissioner.
4. Coordinated programs. Applications to offer coordinated programs shall must be
made to the state board on forms through a process provided by the commissioner. An
educational institution shall pay a fee for the initial application that reflects the costs to the
department for processing the application, as determined by the commissioner.
5. Exempt status. Applications for exempt status under section 10708, subsection 2,
shall must be made to the commissioner. An educational institution shall pay a fee for the
initial application that reflects the costs to the department for processing the application, as
determined by the commissioner.
Sec. 5. P&SL 1973, c. 29, §1 is amended to read:
Sec. 1. Degrees. The College of the Atlantic, located in Bar Harbor, shall have the
power to confer the degree of Bachelor of Arts in Human Ecology as is usually conferred
by like institutions of higher learning.
Page 2 - 132LR2617(03)